California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 77, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

263.

The state scenic highway system is hereby established and shall be composed of the highways specified in this article. The highways listed in Sections 263.1 to 263.8, inclusive, are either eligible for designation as state scenic highways or have been so designated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 775, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

263.1.

The state scenic highway system shall include all of the following state routes:

Routes 28, 35, 38, 52, 53, 62, 74, 75, 76, 89, 96, 97, 127, 128, 150, 151, 154, 156, 158, 161, 173, 197, 199, 203, 209, 221, 236, 239, 243, 247, 254, and 330 in their entirety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 104, Sec. 1.   (AB 998)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

263.2.

The state scenic highway system shall also include:

Route 1 from: 

(a) Route 5 south of San Juan Capistrano to Route 19 near Long Beach. 

(b) Route 187 near Santa Monica to Route 101 near El Rio. 

(c) Route 101 at Las Cruces to Route 246 near Lompoc. 

(d) Route 227 south of Oceano to Route 101 near Pismo Beach. 

(e) Route 101 near San Luis Obispo to Route 35 near Daly City. 

(f) Route 35 in San Francisco to Route 101 near the approach to the Golden Gate Bridge in San Francisco. 

(g) Route 101 near Marin City to Route 101 near Leggett. 

Route 2 from Route 210 in La Canada Flintridge to Route 138 via Wrightwood. 

Route 3 from: 

(a) Route 36 near Peanut to Route 299 near Douglas City. 

(b) Route 299 near Weaverville to Montague. 

Route 4 from: 

(a) Route 160 near Antioch to Route 84 near Brentwood.

(b) Route 49 near Angels Camp to Route 89.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 498, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

263.3.

The state scenic highway system shall also include:

Route 5 from:

(a) The international boundary near Tijuana to Route 75 near the south end of San Diego Bay.

(b) San Diego opposite Coronado to Route 74 near San Juan Capistrano.

(c) Route 210 near Tunnel Station to Route 126 near Castaic.

(d) Route 152 west of Los Banos to Route 580 near Vernalis.

(e) Route 44 near Redding to the Shasta
 Reservoir.

(f) Route 89 near Mt. Shasta to Route 97 near Weed.

(g) Route 3 near Yreka to the Oregon state line near Hilts.

Route 8 from Sunset Cliffs Boulevard in San Diego to Route 98 near Coyote Wells.

Route 9 from:

(a) Route 1 near Santa Cruz to Route 236 near Boulder Creek.

(b) Route 236 near Boulder Creek to Route 236 near Waterman Gap.

(c) Route 236 near Waterman Gap to Route 35.

(d) Saratoga to Route 17 near Los Gatos.

(e) Blaney Plaza in Saratoga to Route 35.

Route 12 from Route 101 near Santa Rosa to Route 121 near Sonoma.

Route 13 from Route 24 to Route 580.

Route 14 from Route 58 near Mojave to Route 395 near Little Lake.

Route 15 from:

(a) Route 76 near the San Luis Rey River to Route 91 near Corona.

(b) Route 58 near Barstow to Route 127 near Baker.

Route 16 from Route 20 to Capay.

Route 17 from Route 1 near Santa Cruz
 to Route 9 near Los
 Gatos.

Route 18 from Route 138 near Mt. Anderson to Route 247 near Lucerne Valley.

Route 20 from:

(a) Route 1 near Fort Bragg to Route 101 near Willits.

(b) Route 101 near Calpella to Route 16.

(c) Route 49 near Grass Valley to Route 80 near Emigrant Gap.

Route 24 from the Alameda-Contra Costa county line to Route 680 in Walnut Creek.

Route 25 from Route 198 to Route 156 near Hollister.

Route 27 from Route 1 to Mulholland Drive.

Route 29 from:

(a) Route 37 near Vallejo to Route 221 near Napa.

(b) The vicinity of Trancas Street in northwest Napa to Route 20 near Upper Lake.

Route 33 from:

(a) Route 101 near Ventura to Route 150.

(b) Route 150 to Route 166 in Cuyama Valley.

(c) Route 198 near Coalinga to Route 198 near Oilfields.

Route 36 from:

(a) Route 101 near Alton to Route 3 near Peanut.

(b) Route 89 near Morgan Summit to Route 89 near
 Deer Creek Pass.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 173, Sec. 1.   (SB 169)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

263.4.

The state scenic highway system shall also include:

Route 37 from:

(a) Route 251 near Nicasio to Route 101 near Novato.

(b) Route 101 near Ignacio to Route 29 near Vallejo.

Route 39 from Route 210 near Azusa to Route 2.

Route 40 from Barstow to Needles.

Route 41 from:

(a) Route 1 near Morro Bay to Route 101 near Atascadero.

(b) Route 46 near Cholame to Route 33.

(c) Route 49 near Oakhurst to Yosemite National Park.

Route 44 from Route 5 near Redding to Route 89 near Old Station.

Route 46 from:

(a) Route 1 near Cambria to Route 101 near Paso Robles.

(b) Route 101 near Paso Robles to Route 41 near Cholame.

Route 49 from:

(a) Route 41 near Oakhurst to Route 120 near Moccasin.

(b) Route 120 to Route 20 near Grass Valley.

(c) Route 20 near Nevada City to Route 89 near Sattley.

Route 50 from Route 49 near Placerville to the Nevada state line near Lake Tahoe.

Route 57 from Route 90 to Route 60 near Industry.

Route 58 from Route 14 near Mojave to Route 15 near Barstow.

Route 68 from Monterey to Route 101 near Salinas.

Route 70 from Route 149 near Wicks Corner to Route 89 near Blairsden.

Route 71 from Route 91 near Corona to Route 83 north of Corona.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 106, Sec. 12.   Effective May 13, 1988.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

263.5.

The state scenic highway system shall also include:

Route 78 from Route 79 near Santa Ysabel to Route 86 passing near Julian.

Route 79 from:

(a) Route 8 near Descanso to Route 78 near Julian.

(b) Route 78 near Santa Ysabel to Route 371 near Aguanga.

Route 80 from:

(a) Route 280 near First Street in San Francisco to Route 61 in Oakland.

(b) Route 20 near Emigrant Gap to the Nevada state line near Verdi, Nevada.

Route 84 from Route 238 to Route 680 near Sunol.

Route 88 from Route 49 in Jackson to the Nevada state line via Pine Grove, Silver Lake, and Kirkwood.

Route 91 from Route 55 near Santa Ana Canyon to Route 15 near Corona.

Route 92 from Route 1 near Half Moon Bay to Route 280 near Crystal Springs Lake.

Route 94 from Route 125 near Spring Valley to Route 8 west of Jacumba.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 837, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

263.6.

The state scenic highway system shall also include:

Route 101 from:

(a) Route 27 (Topanga Canyon Road) to Route 46 near Paso Robles.

(b) Route 156 near Prunedale northeasterly to Route 156.

(c) A point in Marin County opposite San Francisco to Route 1 near Marin City.

(d) Route 37 near Ignacio to Route 37 near Novato.

(e) Route 20 near Calpella to Route 20 near Willits.

(f) Route 1 near Leggett to Route 199 near Crescent City.

(g) Route 197 near Fort Dick to the Oregon state line.

Route 108 from Route 49 near Sonora to Route 395.

Route 111 from:

(a) Bombay Beach in Salton Sea State Park to Route 195 near Mecca.

(b) Route 74 near Palm Desert to Route 10 near Whitewater.

Route 116 from Route 101 near Cotati to Route 1 near Jenner.

Route 118 from Route 23 to DeSoto Avenue near Browns Canyon.

Route 120 from:

(a) Route 49 near Chinese Camp to Route 49 near Moccasin.

(b) The east boundary of Yosemite National Park to Route 395 near Mono Lake. 

Route 121 from:

(a) Route 37 near Sears Point to Route 12 near Sonoma.

(b) Route 221 near Napa State Hospital to near the vicinity of Trancas Street in northeast Napa.

Route 125 from Route 94 near Spring Valley to Route 8 near La Mesa.

Route 126 from Route 150 near Santa Paula to Route 5 near Castaic.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 29.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

263.7.

The state scenic highway system shall also include:

Route 138 from Route 2 near Wrightwood to Route 18 near Mt. Anderson. 

Route 139 from Route 299 near Canby to the Oregon state line near Hatfield. 

Route 140 from Route 49 at Mariposa to Yosemite National Park near El Portal. 

Route 142 from the Orange-San Bernardino county line to Peyton Drive. 

Route 146 from Pinnacles National Monument to Route 25 in Bear Valley. 

Route 152 from: 

(a) Route 1 to the Santa Clara county line at Hecker Pass. 

(b) Route 156 near San Felipe to Route 5. 

Route 160 from Route 4 near Antioch to Sacramento. 

Route 163 from Ash Street in San Diego to Route 8. 

Route 166 from Route 101 near Santa Maria to Route 33 in Cuyama Valley. 

Route 168 from: 

(a) Route 65 near Clovis to Huntington Lake. 

(b) Camp Sabrina to Route 395.

(c) Route 395 at Big Pine to Route 266 at Oasis. 

Route 174 from the Bear River to the Grass Valley city limits. 

Route 178 from the east boundary of Death Valley National Monument to Route 127 near Shoshone. 

Route 180 from: 

(a) Route 65 near Minkler to General Grant Grove section of Kings Canyon National Park. 

(b) General Grant Grove section of Kings Canyon National Park to Kings Canyon National Park boundary near Cedar Grove. 

Route 190 from Route 65 near Porterville to Route 127 near Death Valley Junction. 

Route 266 from the Nevada state line easterly of Oasis to Route 168 at Oasis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 775, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

263.8.

The state scenic highway system shall also include:

Route 198 from:

(a) Route 101 near San Lucas to Route 33 near Coalinga.

(b) Route 33 near Oilfields to Route 5.

(c) Route 99 near Goshen to the Sequoia National Park line.

Route 210 from:

(a) Route 5 near Tunnel Station to Route 134.

(b) Route 330 near Highland to Route 10 near Redlands.

Route 215 from Route 74 near Romoland to Route 74 near Perris.

Route 251 from Route 37 near Nicasio to Route 1 near Point Reyes Station.

Route 280 from Route 17 in Santa Clara County to Route 80 near First Street in San Francisco.

Route 299 from:

(a) Route 101 near Arcata to Route 96 near Willow Creek.

(b) Route 3 near Weaverville to Route 5 near Redding.

(c) Route 89 near Burney to Route 139 near Canby.

Route 395 from Route 14 near Little Lake to Route 89 near Coleville.

Route 580 from Route 5 southwest of Vernalis to Route 80.

Route 680 from the Santa Clara-Alameda county line to Route 24 in Walnut Creek.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 221, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

280.

(a) There is created within the state scenic highway system a system of California Historic Parkways.

(b) California Historic Parkways are freeways that meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The original construction was completed prior to 1945.

(2) The department or the Office of Historic Preservation in the Department of Parks and Recreation announces or recognizes features of historical significance, including notable landmarks, historical sites, or natural or human achievements that exist or that occurred during the original construction of the parkway or in the immediately adjacent land area through which the parkway currently passes.

(3) Any portion of the highway or corridor is bounded on one or both sides by federal, state, or local parkland, Native American lands or monuments, or other open space, greenbelt areas, natural habitat or wildlife preserves, or similar acreage used for or dedicated to historical or recreational uses.

(4) Any portion of the highway is traversed, at the time of designation and by the department’s best count or estimate using existing information, by not less than 40,000 vehicles per day on an annual daily average basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 179, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

281.

(a) The department, in consultation with the Office of Historic Preservation in the Department of Parks and Recreation, shall design signs and markers for exclusive use on California Historic Parkways that are distinct in color or other easily recognizable features from standard forms of signs on other state highways.

(b) The department shall cause appropriate signs and markers to be placed and maintained along those portions of the highways which have been designated as California Historic Parkways.

(c) The department shall include all California Historic Parkways on any maps or publications it issues that describe or depict State Scenic Highways.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 179, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

282.

A local agency, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 65402 of the Government Code, shall coordinate its planning with, and obtain approval from, the appropriate local planning agency with regard to the construction of any agency facility that would be located within any California Historic Parkway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 179, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

283.

That part of the California highway system frequently referred to as the Pasadena Freeway, which is the section of Interstate Highway Route 110 lying between milepost 25.7 and milepost 31.9 is hereby designated a California Historic Parkway pursuant to Section 280, and is named the Arroyo Seco Parkway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 179, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

284.

That part of the California highway system frequently referred to as the Cabrillo Freeway, which is the segment of State Highway Route 163 between postmiles 0.5 and 3.0 through Balboa Park in the City of San Diego, is hereby designated a California Historic Parkway and is named the Cabrillo Parkway.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 965, Sec. 3.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The State Highway Routes [300. - 635.]

300.

The state highway system shall consist of the routes described in this article.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this article, that the routes of the state highway system serve the state’s heavily traveled rural and urban corridors, that they connect the communities and regions of the state, and that they serve the state’s economy by connecting centers of commerce, industry, agriculture, mineral wealth, and recreation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 317, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

301.

Route 1 is from:

(a) Route 5 south of San Juan Capistrano to Route 101 near El Rio except for the portions of Route 1 relinquished:

(1) Within the city limits of the City of Dana Point between the western edge of the San Juan Creek Bridge and Eastline Road at the city limits of the City of Laguna Beach.

(2) Within the city limits of the City of Newport Beach between Jamboree Road and Newport Coast Drive.

(3) Within the city limits of the City of Santa Monica between the southern city limits and Route 10.

(4) Within the city limits of the City of Oxnard between Pleasant Valley Road and Route 101.

(b) Route 101 at Emma Wood State Beach, 1.3 miles north of Route 33, to Route 101, 2.8 miles south of the Ventura-Santa Barbara county line at Mobil Pier Undercrossing.

(c) Route 101 near Las Cruces to Route 101 in Pismo Beach via the vicinity of Lompoc, Vandenberg Air Force Base, and Guadalupe.

(d) Route 101 in San Luis Obispo to Route 280 south of San Francisco along the coast via Cambria, San Simeon, and Santa Cruz.

(e) Route 280 near the south boundary of the City and County of San Francisco to
 Route 101 near the approach to the Golden Gate Bridge in San Francisco.

(f) Route 101 near the southerly end of Marin Peninsula to Route 101 near Leggett via the coast route through Jenner and Westport.

(g) The relinquished former portions of Route 1 within the Cities of Dana Point, Newport Beach, Santa Monica, and Oxnard are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For those relinquished former portions of Route 1, the Cities of Dana Point, Newport Beach, Santa Monica, and Oxnard shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 1. The City of Newport Beach shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portions of Route 1 within its jurisdiction, including, but not limited to,
 any traffic signal progression.

(h) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interest of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Los Angeles the portion of Route 1 within the city between the southern city limit of the City of Santa Monica (approximately postmile 33.3) and Route 105 (approximately postmile 25.9), if the department and the City of Los Angeles enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment. The following conditions shall apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 1 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) The portion of Route 1 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) The City of Los Angeles shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 1, including any traffic signal progression, to the extent applicable.

(5) For the portion of Route 1 relinquished under this subdivision, the City of Los Angeles shall install and maintain within its jurisdiction, signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 1 to the extent deemed necessary by the
 department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.   (AB 810)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

301.1.

(a) The commission may relinquish to the City of Torrance the portion of Route 1 that is located within the city limits of the city, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state.

(b) A relinquishment under this section shall become effective immediately following the recordation by the county recorder of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(c) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall occur:

(1) The portion of Route 1 relinquished under this section shall cease to be a state highway.

(2) The portion of Route 1 relinquished under this section may not be considered for future adoption under Section 81.

(d) The city shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 1, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(e) For the portion of Route 1 that is relinquished, the city shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 639, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

301.3.

(a) The commission may relinquish to the City of Newport Beach the portion of Route 1 that is located between Jamboree Road and the Santa Ana River, within the city limits of the City of Newport Beach, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state.

(b) A relinquishment under this section shall become effective immediately following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(c) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall occur:

(1) The portion of Route 1 relinquished under this section shall cease to be a state highway.

(2) The portion of Route 1 relinquished under this section shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(d) The City of Newport Beach shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portions of Route 1, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(e) For those portions of Route 1 that are relinquished, the City of Newport Beach shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 344)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

301.4.

(a) Upon the commission determining that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions it approves, relinquish to the City of Laguna Beach the portion of Route 1 that is located between Moro Ridge Road and Via Mentone if the department and the City of Laguna Beach enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(b) A relinquishment under this section shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(c) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, all of the
 following shall occur:

(1) The relinquished portion of Route 1 shall cease to be a state highway.

(2) The relinquished portion of Route 1 shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(3) The City of Laguna Beach shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 1, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(4) For the relinquished portion of Route 1, the City of Laguna Beach shall maintain signs within its jurisdiction directing motorists to the continuation of Route 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 416, Sec. 1.   (AB 2817)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

301.5.

(a) Upon the commission determining that it is in the best interest of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions it approves, relinquish to the City of Pismo Beach the
 portion of Route 1 within the city limits of the City of Pismo Beach if the department and the City of Pismo Beach enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(b) A relinquishment under this section shall become effective on
 the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(c) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, all of the following shall occur:

(1) The relinquished portion of Route 1 shall cease to be a state highway.

(2) The relinquished portion of Route 1 shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(3) The City of Pismo Beach shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 1, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(4) For the relinquished portion of Route 1, the City of Pismo Beach shall maintain signs within its jurisdiction directing motorists to the continuation of Route 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 506, Sec. 1.   (SB 504)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

302.

(a) Route 2 is from:

(1) The point where Santa Monica Boulevard crosses the city limits of Santa Monica at Centinela Avenue to Route 405 in Los Angeles.

(2) The point where Santa Monica Boulevard crosses the city limits of West Hollywood into the City of Los Angeles at La Brea Avenue to Route 101 in Los Angeles.

(3) Route 101 in Los Angeles to Route 210 in La Canada-Flintridge via Glendale.

(4) Route 210 in La Canada-Flintridge to Route 138 via Wrightwood.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 2 within the Cities of West Hollywood, Santa Monica, Beverly Hills, and Los Angeles are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. Those cities shall maintain signs within their respective jurisdictions directing motorists to the continuation of Route 2.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may relinquish to the City of Los Angeles the conventional highway portion of Route 2 that is located within the city limits of that city, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, including, but not limited to, a condition that the City of Los Angeles maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 2.

(2) A relinquishment under this
 subdivision shall become effective immediately following the recording by the county recorder of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall occur:

(A) The portion of Route 2 relinquished under this subdivision shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) The portion of Route 2 relinquished under this subdivision may not be considered for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) For the portions of Route 2 that are relinquished, the City of Los Angeles shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 15.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

303.

Route 3 is from:

(a) Route 36 near Peanut to Route 299 near Douglas City.

(b) Route 299 near Weaverville to Montague via Main Street in Yreka.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 123.)
-------------------------------------------

304.

Route 4 is from:

(a) Route 80 in Hercules to Route 5 in Stockton via north of Concord and via Antioch.

(b) Route 5 to Route 99.

(c) Route 99 in Stockton to Route 49 at Altaville via the vicinity of Copperopolis.

(d) Route 49 in Angels Camp to Route 89 near Markleeville via Murphys, Calaveras Big Trees, Dorrington, and Bear Valley.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 30.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

305.

Route 5 is from the international boundary near Tijuana to the Oregon state line via National City, San Diego, Los Angeles, the westerly side of the San Joaquin Valley, Sacramento, and Yreka; also passing near Santa Ana, Glendale, Woodland, and Red Bluff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

306.

Route 6 is from Route 395 near Bishop to the Nevada state line near Montgomery Pass.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

307.

Route 7 is from the northerly boundary of the Federal Port of Entry near Calexico to Route 8 near El Centro.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 31.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

308.

Route 8 is from:

(a) Sunset Cliffs Boulevard to Route 5 in San Diego.

(b) Route 5 in San Diego to Yuma via El Centro.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

309.

Route 9 is from Route 1 near Santa Cruz to Route 17 near Los Gatos via Waterman Gap and Saratoga Gap and along the ridge between the San Lorenzo and Pescadero Creeks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 292, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

310.

Route 10 is from:

(a) Route 1 in Santa Monica to Route 5 near Seventh Street in Los Angeles.

(b) Route 101 near Mission Road in Los Angeles to the Arizona state line at the Colorado River via the vicinity of Monterey Park, Pomona, Colton, Indio, and Chiriaco Summit and via Blythe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

311.

Route 11 is from the northerly border of the new Federal Port of Entry and east of the Otay Mesa Port of Entry to near the junction of Route 125 and Route 905.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 32.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

312.

Route 12 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Valley Ford to Route 121 near Sonoma via Santa Rosa.

(b) Route 29 in the vicinity of Napa to Route 80 near Cordelia.

(c) Route 80 near Fairfield to Route 99 near Lodi via Rio Vista.

(d) Route 99 near Lodi to Route 88 near Lockeford.

(e) Route 88 near Clements to Route 49 near San Andreas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1354.)
-------------------------------------------

313.

Route 13 is from Route 61 near the Oakland International Airport to Route 61 near Emeryville via the vicinity of Lake Temescal.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

314.

Route 14 is from:

(a) Route 1 north of the intersection of Sunset Boulevard northwest of Santa Monica to Route 5 near Tunnel Station.

(b) Route 5 at Los Angeles near Tunnel Station to Route 58.

(c) Route 58 to Route 395 near Little Lake via the vicinity of Antelope Valley.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

314.1.

(a) The commission may relinquish to the City of Santa Clarita all or any portion of Sierra Highway, also known as Route 14U, located within the city limits of that city, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(b) A relinquishment under this section shall become effective immediately after the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(c) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall occur:

(1) The portion
 of Route 14U relinquished shall cease to be a state highway.

(2) The portion of Route 14U relinquished shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 351, Sec. 2.   (AB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

315.

Route 15 is from:

(a) Route 5 in San Diego to Route 8.

(b) Route 8 to the Nevada state line near Stateline, Nevada via the vicinity of Temecula, Corona, Ontario, Victorville, and Barstow.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 33.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

316.

(a) Route 16 is from:

(1) Route 20 to Route 5 near Woodland via Rumsey and Woodland.

(2) Route 50 near Perkins to Route 49 near Drytown.

(b) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Sacramento the portion of Route 16 that is located within the city limits of that city if the city agrees to accept it. The following conditions shall apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 16 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) The portion of Route 16 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) For the portion of Route 16 relinquished under this subdivision, the City of Sacramento shall apply for approval of a business route designation for the relinquished portion of the highway in accordance with Chapter 20, Topic 21, of the Highway Design
 Manual.

(5) For the portion of Route 16 relinquished under this subdivision, the City of Sacramento shall install and maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 16 to the east.

(6) The City of Sacramento shall maintain the Surface Transportation Assistance Act (STAA) truck route designation for the portion of Route 16 relinquished that previously held that designation.

(c) (1) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the County of Sacramento the
 portion of Route 16 that is within the unincorporated area of the county and between the general easterly city limits of the City of Sacramento, approximately post mile 3.3, and 0.2 miles east of Grant Line Road, approximately post mile 12.7, if the county agrees to accept it.

(2) The following conditions shall apply upon relinquishment:

(A) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(B) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 16 shall cease to be a state highway.

(C) The
 portion of Route 16 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(D) For the portion of Route 16 relinquished under this subdivision, the County of Sacramento shall apply for approval of a business route designation for the relinquished portion of the highway in accordance with Chapter 20, Topic 21, of the Highway Design Manual.

(E) For the
 portion of Route 16 relinquished under this subdivision, the County of Sacramento shall install and maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 16 to the east.

(F) The County of Sacramento shall maintain the STAA truck route designation for the portion of Route 16 relinquished that previously held that designation.

(G) The County of Sacramento shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished
 portion of Route 16 within its jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(H) Any relinquishment agreement shall require that the County of Sacramento administer the operation and maintenance of the roadway in a manner that is consistent with professional traffic engineering standards.

(I) Any relinquishment agreement shall require the County of Sacramento to ensure that appropriate traffic studies or analyses will be performed to substantiate decisions affecting traffic on the roadway.

(d) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved
 by it, relinquish to the City of Rancho Cordova the portion of Route 16 that is within the city limits of the city between Sunrise Boulevard, approximately post mile 11.5, and Grant Line Road, approximately post mile 12.5, if the city agrees to accept it. The following conditions shall apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 16 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) The portion of Route 16 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) For the portion of Route 16 relinquished under this subdivision, the City of Rancho Cordova shall apply for approval of a business route designation for the relinquished portion of the highway
 in accordance with Chapter 20, Topic 21, of the Highway Design Manual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 630, Sec. 2.   (AB 652)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

317.

Route 17 is from Route 1 near Santa Cruz to Route 280 in San Jose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

318.

Route 18 is from:

(a) Route 10 near San Bernardino to Route 210.

(b) Route 210 near San Bernardino to Route 15 in Victorville via Big Bear Lake.

(c) Route 15 near Victorville to Route 138 near Pearblossom.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

319.

(a) Route 19 is from the northern city limit of the City of Lakewood to Gardendale Street/Foster Road in the Cities of Bellflower and Downey.

(b) If the commission determines it is in the state’s best interests to do so, it may do the following, pursuant to a cooperative agreement between the respective city and the department:

(1) Relinquish to the City of Bellflower the portion of Route 19 between the city’s southerly city limit near Rose Avenue and Gardendale Street/Foster Road.

(2) Relinquish to the City of Downey the portion of Route 19 between the city’s southerly city limit at Century
 Boulevard and Gardendale Street.

(c) A relinquishment under this section shall become effective when the county recorder records the relinquishment resolution containing the commissioner’s approval of the relinquishment’s terms and conditions.

(d) Any portion of Route 19 relinquished pursuant to this section shall cease to be a state highway on the effective date of the relinquishment.

(e) The relinquished former portions of Route 19 within the Cities of Downey, Lakewood, Long Beach, and Pico Rivera are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portions of Route 19, the Cities of Downey, Lakewood, Long Beach, and Pico Rivera shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 19. The City of Lakewood shall
 ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished former portion of Route 19, including any traffic signal progression.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 5.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

320.

Route 20 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Fort Bragg to Route 101 at Willits.

(b) Route 101 to Route 80 near Emigrant Gap via Williams and Colusa.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

322.

Route 22 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Long Beach to Route 405.

(b) Route 405 to Route 55 near Orange.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1372.)
-------------------------------------------

323.

Route 23 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Aliso Canyon to Route 101.

(b) Route 101 in Thousand Oaks to Route 118.

(c) Route 118 to Route 126 near Fillmore.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

324.

Route 24 is from:

(a) Route 580 in Oakland to Route 680 in Walnut Creek.

(b) Route 680 in Walnut Creek to Route 4 near Pittsburg.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1187, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

325.

(a) Route 25 is from Route 198 to Route 101 near Gilroy.

(b) (1) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Hollister the portion of Route 25 that is located within the city’s jurisdiction between Sunnyslope Road and San Felipe Road prior to the relocation of that portion of Route 25 through adoption of the proposed new easterly bypass alignment of Route 25, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) The terms
 and conditions imposed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include a requirement for the City of Hollister to maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 25 until such time as the new easterly bypass alignment is adopted and opens to traffic.
